Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-307
Insurance companies; business authorized.

No domestic insurance company shall transact any business other than that specified in its articles of incorporation or otherwise authorized by law, and no foreign or alien company admitted to transact business in this state shall transact any other kind of business than that which it has been authorized by the laws of the state or country of its incorporation to do.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 48, p. 419;

R.S.1913, § 3184;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 19, p. 598;

C.S.1922, § 7784;

C.S.1929, § 44-319;

R.S.1943, 44-307;

Laws 1969, c. 356, § 20, p. 1251.